New York, session 2025-2026, A9359.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 10 of section 2807-m of the 2 public health law, as amended by section 13 of part B of chapter 58 of 3 the laws of 2010, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) Beginning January first, two thousand eight, the commissioner is 5 authorized, within amounts available pursuant to subdivision five-a of 6 this section, to make loan repayment awards to primary care physicians 7 or other physician specialties determined by the commissioner to be in 8 short supply, licensed to practice medicine in New York state, who agree 9 to practice for at least five years in an underserved area, as deter- 10 mined by the commissioner. Such physician shall be eligible for a loan 11 repayment award of up to [one] two hundred fifty thousand dollars over a 12 five year period distributed as follows: fifteen percent of total loan 13 debt not to exceed twenty thousand dollars for the first year; fifteen 14 percent of total loan debt not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars 15 for the second year; twenty percent of total loan debt not to exceed 16 thirty-five thousand dollars for the third year; and twenty-five percent 17 of total loan debt not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars per year 18 for the fourth year; and any unpaid balance of the total loan debt not 19 to exceed the maximum award amount for the fifth year of practice in 20 such area. 21 § 2. Subdivision 12 of section 2807-m of the public health law, as 22 amended by section 6 of part Y of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, is 23 amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08588-01-5 A. 9359 2 1 12. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, applications 2 submitted on or after April first, two thousand sixteen, for the physi- 3 cian loan repayment program pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision 4 five-a of this section and subdivision ten of this section or the physi- 5 cian practice support program pursuant to paragraph (d) of subdivision 6 five-a of this section, shall be subject to the following changes: 7 (a) Awards shall be made from the total funding available for new 8 awards under the physician loan repayment program and the physician 9 practice support program, with neither program limited to a specific 10 funding amount within such total funding available; 11 (b) An applicant may apply for an award for either physician loan 12 repayment or physician practice support, but not both; 13 (c) An applicant shall agree to practice for three years in an under- 14 served area and each award shall provide up to [forty thousand]: 15 (i) eighty-three thousand three hundred thirty-three dollars for each 16 of the three years for a physician loan repayment award; 17 (ii) sixty-six thousand six hundred sixty-six dollars for each of the 18 three years for a physician practice support award; and 19 (d) To the extent practicable, awards shall be timed to be of use for 20 job offers made to applicants. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.